snk.dix
<dictionary>
<alphabet>
abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZ
</alphabet>
<sdefs>
<sdef n="snk" c="cat=sankhya"/>
</sdefs>
<pardefs>
<pardef n="Sawa/_snk">
        <e><p>
                <l></l>
                <r><s n="snk"/></r>
        </p></e>

</pardef>
</pardefs>
<section id="main" type="standard">
<e lm="Sawa"><i>Sawa</i><par n="Sawa/_snk"/></e>
<e lm="eVMtu"><i>eVMtu</i><par n="Sawa/_snk"/></e>
<e lm="aRta"><i>aRta</i><par n="Sawa/_snk"/></e>
<e lm="aRtAxaSa"><i>aRtAxaSa</i><par n="Sawa/_snk"/></e>
<e lm="eka"><i>eka</i><par n="Sawa/_snk"/></e>
<e lm="bawwIsa"><i>bawwIsa</i><par n="Sawa/_snk"/></e>
<e lm="elYu"><i>elYu</i><par n="Sawa/_snk"/></e>
<e lm="oVMxu"><i>oVMxu</i><par n="Sawa/_snk"/></e>
</section>
</dictionary>
